Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1004.   Family participation in UPSTART.
(1)  The contractor shall solicit families to participate in UPSTART through a
public information campaign and referrals from participating school districts.
(2) (a)  Preschool children who participate in UPSTART shall:
(i)  be from families with diverse socioeconomic and ethnic backgrounds; and
(ii)  reside in different regions of the state in both urban and rural areas.
(b)  At least 30% of the preschool children who participate in UPSTART shall
be from low income families.
(3)  A low income family that cannot afford a computer and Internet service to
operate the instructional software may obtain a computer and peripheral
equipment on loan and receive free Internet service for the duration of the
family's participation in the pilot project.
(4)  The contractor shall make the home-based educational technology program
available to families at an agreed upon cost if the number of families who
would like to participate in UPSTART exceeds the number of participants funded
by the legislative appropriation.
